Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault.

Sec. 18.66.010.
Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault; purpose.

There is established in the Department of Public Safety the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault.
The purpose of the council is to provide for planning and coordination of services to victims of domestic violence or sexual assault or to their families and to perpetrators of domestic violence and sexual assault and to provide for crisis intervention and prevention programs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1981)

Sec. 18.66.020.
Membership, terms, vacancies, and disqualification.

The council consists of

four public members appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be from a rural area; the governor may consult with the Alaska Network on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, a nonprofit corporation, in appointing the public members under this paragraph; the Alaska Network on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault shall submit a list to the governor of persons recommended for appointment;

the commissioner of public safety or the designee of the commissioner of public safety;

the commissioner of health and social services or the designee of the commissioner of health and social services;

the commissioner of education and early development or the designee of the commissioner of education and early development;

the attorney general or the designee of the attorney general; and

the commissioner of corrections or the designee of the commissioner of corrections.

The term of office of a public member appointed under (a)(1) of this section is three years. A public member appointed under (a)(1) of this section serves at the pleasure of the governor and may not serve more than two consecutive terms. A vacancy on the council shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor. The governor may consult with the Alaska Network on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault on an appointment of a public member made under this subsection.

A person who receives compensation from or is an employee of the State of Alaska or a domestic violence, sexual assault, or crisis intervention or prevention program may not be appointed as a public member of the council.

In this section, “rural area” means a community with a population of 7,500 or less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks or with a population of 3,500 or less that is connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1981; am §§ 1, 2 ch 47 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2002, in the last sentence of subsection (b), “and Sexual Assault” was added after “Violence” to correct a manifest error in § 1, ch. 101, SLA 1981.

Sec. 18.66.030.
Compensation and expenses.

The members of the council receive no salary but are entitled to transportation expenses and per diem in accordance with AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1981)

Sec. 18.66.040.
Meetings and quorum.

The council shall meet at least four times a year. At least one meeting each year shall include a statewide public teleconference hearing. The time and place of a meeting shall be set by the presiding officer or by three members who submit a written request for a meeting to the presiding officer. Five members of the council constitute a quorum.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 2009)

Sec. 18.66.050.
Duties of the council.

The council shall

hire an executive director, and the executive director may hire staff; the executive director is in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

and staff members are in the classified service under AS

39.25.100

;

elect one of its members as presiding officer;

in consultation with authorities in the field, develop, implement, maintain, and monitor domestic violence, sexual assault, and crisis intervention and prevention programs, including educational programs, films, and school curricula on the cause, prevention, and treatment of domestic violence and sexual assault;

coordinate services provided by the Department of Law, the Department of Education and Early Development, the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Health and Social Services, the Department of Corrections, and other state agencies and community groups dealing with domestic violence, sexual assault, and crisis intervention and prevention, and provide technical assistance as requested by those state agencies and community groups;

develop and implement a standardized data collection system on domestic violence, sexual assault, and crisis intervention and prevention;

conduct public hearings and studies on issues relating to violence, including domestic violence and sexual assault, and on issues relating to the role of crisis intervention and prevention;

receive and dispense state and federal money and award grants and contracts from appropriations for the purpose to qualified local community entities for domestic violence, sexual assault, and crisis intervention and prevention programs;

oversee and audit domestic violence, sexual assault, and crisis intervention and prevention programs that receive money under this chapter;

provide fiscal and technical assistance to plan, organize, implement, and administer domestic violence, sexual assault, and crisis intervention and prevention programs;

make an annual report to the governor on the activities of the council, plans of the council for new services and programs, and concerns of the council, including recommendations for legislation necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; the council shall notify the legislature that the report is available;

adopt regulations in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to protect the health, safety, well-being, and privacy of persons receiving services financed with grants or contracts under this chapter;

consult with the Department of Health and Social Services in the formulation of standards and procedures for the delivery of services to victims of domestic violence by health care facilities and practitioners of healing arts and personnel in those facilities as required in AS

18.66.300

;

consult with the Alaska Police Standards Council and other police training programs in the state to develop training programs regarding domestic violence for police officers and for correction, probation, and parole officers;

consult with public employers, the Alaska Supreme Court, school districts, and prosecuting authorities who are required by AS

18.66.300

—

18.66.310

to provide continuing education courses in domestic violence to employees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1981; am § 35 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 32 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 47 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For domestic violence and sexual assault program standards, see 13 AAC 90.

For grant programs, see 13 AAC 95.

Sec. 18.66.060.
Qualifications for grants and contracts.

A local community entity is qualified to receive a grant or contract under this chapter if it agrees to provide services approved by the council to victims of domestic violence or sexual assault or their families or to perpetrators of domestic violence or sexual assault without regard to ability to pay.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1981)